Vermont, session 2025-2026, H640.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly to include voting student members
on the boards of any new school districts the General Assembly enacts
pursuant to 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73.
VT LEG #386205 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.640
2026 Page 2 of 3
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 564 is added to read:
§ 564. SCHOOL BOARDS; STUDENT MEMBER
(a) Notwithstanding sections 558, 729, and 747 of this title or any other
provision of law to the contrary, the school board of a town, city, or
incorporated or union school district or the member districts of a joint contract
district or a regional technical center school district, which is organized to
provide secondary education for its resident students or maintains a regional
technical center, shall have student members on the school board in accordance
with this section.
(1) Each school board of a school district that is organized to provide for
the education of its resident students in grades nine through 12 shall have one
voting student member from each of grades nine, 10, 11, and 12, for a total of
four voting student members, regardless of how many high schools the school
district operates.
(2) Each school board of a school district that is organized to provide for
the education of its resident students in grades seven and eight shall have one
nonvoting student member from each of grades seven and eight, for a total of
two nonvoting student members, regardless of how many schools the district
operates that provide education in grades seven and eight.
(3) Both nonvoting and voting student school board members shall serve
as a board member for the same term length as a nonstudent member;
VT LEG #386205 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.640
2026 Page 3 of 3
provided, however, that in the case of a school district that operates schools for
some or all of the applicable grades, the student school board members shall
also be enrolled in and attending a school operated by the district for the entire
time they serve as a school board member. If a student school board member
graduates before the student’s term expires, the student shall be ineligible to
serve on the school board and a new student school board member shall be
appointed pursuant to the process developed under subdivision (4) of this
subsection.
(4) Both nonvoting and voting student school board members shall be
appointed by the superintendent of the school district, following a process
adopted by the school board that enables secondary students to participate in
the choice of the student members.
(5) Nothing in this section shall preclude a school board from appointing
a nonvoting student member or members.
(b) The provisions of this section shall supersede any educational charter
provision or school district articles of agreement to the contrary.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386205 v.2